Washington statutes.
RCW 2.43.080

Code of ethics.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1174-S2.SL) ***

All language interpreters serving in a legal proceeding, whether or not certified or qualified, shall abide by a code of ethics established by supreme court rule.

[1989 c 358 s 8. Formerly RCW 2.42.270.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 358: See note following RCW 2.43.010.